Massachusetts, session 194th, S3052.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the town of
Dighton may transfer the care, custody, management and control of a portion of certain parcels
of land located at 0 Pleasant Street having an area of 514 square feet and shown as Parcels E-2,
GR-1 and S-3 on a plan of land entitled “Massachusetts Department of Transportation Highway
Division Plan and Profile of Pleasant Street Bridge No. D-08-002 In the Town of Dighton Bristol
County Preliminary Right of Way Plans” prepared by BETA Group, Inc., and temporary
easements as shown on said plan, from the conservation commission for conservation purposes
to the Board of Selectmen for general municipal purposes, including for the replacement of a
roadway bridge serving the adjacent public way. The land is identified on the town’s assessor’s
maps as parcels 076/020.0-0012 and 076/020.0-0013, and includes lands acquired by the town
for conservation purposes by deed recorded with the Bristol County Northern District registry of
deeds in book 19498, page 268.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1